Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5939.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. INTENT.The legislature finds that policies enacted in Olympia over the last decade have directly contributed to Washington becoming increasingly unaffordable for many residents, with core necessities such as food, gas, and housing all amongst the most costly in the country. This impact has been particularly felt and borne by working-class individuals and families in Washington. This act is intended to assist lower-income residents for whom Washington is simply no longer affordable that desire to relocate to a more affordable state.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 43.79 RCW to read as follows:CREATION OF THE WASHINGTON IS SIMPLY UNAFFORDABLE FUND. The Washington is simply unaffordable fund is created in the state treasury. Proceeds from the fund may be used only to reimburse residents below 300 percent of the federal poverty level for documented moving expenses incurred in moving to another state. To be eligible, claimants must meet the income threshold, attest that the primary reason for the move was the increasing unaffordability of living in Washington, and have moved to a state with a higher ranking than Washington on the relative value of $100 measure in the annual economic climate report issued under RCW 82.33A.010.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. APPROPRIATION.The sum of $7,000,000, or as much thereof as may be necessary, is appropriated for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027, from the general fundâstate to the state treasurer for deposit into the Washington is simply unaffordable fund created in section 2 of this act.--- END ---